Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
431P

HAWAII
HURRICANE RELIEF FUND

Part I. General Provisions

Section

431P-1 Definitions

431P-2 Establishment of Hawaii hurricane relief
fund

431P-3 Board of directors

431P-4 Planning and assessment functions of the
fund;

discretion to provide insurance

431P-5 Powers, duties, and functions

431P-5.5 Accumulation of $500,000,000 in funds and

commitments

431P-6 Advisory committee

431P-7 Plan of operation

431P-8 Annual statements

431P-9 Powers of the commissioner

431P-10 Coverage available from the fund;
deductible

431P-11 Underlying policy required; hurricane
coverage

shall be provided

431P-12 Mitigation

431P-13 Appeals

431P-14 Immunity and limitation on liability

431P-15 Exemption from property and liability
insurance

guaranty association; insolvency of fund

431P-16 Establishment of trust funds

431P-16.5 Immunity

431P-17 Additional notice requirement

431P-18 Exemption for Hawaiian home lands

Cross References

Loss mitigation grant program, see chapter 431, article 22.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next